apertium-sme-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON NounAllomorph/PartitiveA
@U.AGREE.SGfPAR@[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:@U.AGREE.SGfPAR@{aä}{AV+}	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfPAR@[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfPAR@{aä}{AV+}	Compounding		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfNOM@@R.ALLOW.SGfPAR@[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfNOM@@R.ALLOW.SGfPAR@{aä}{AV+}	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfNOM@@R.ALLOW.SGfPAR@[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfNOM@@R.ALLOW.SGfPAR@{aä}{AV+}	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA
@U.AGREE.SGfPAR@[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:@U.AGREE.SGfPAR@{AV-}t{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfPAR@[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfPAR@{AV-}t{aä}	Compounding		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfNOM@@R.ALLOW.SGfPAR@[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfNOM@@R.ALLOW.SGfPAR@{AV-}t{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfNOM@@R.ALLOW.SGfPAR@[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfNOM@@R.ALLOW.SGfPAR@{AV-}t{aä}	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/IllativeHVN
@U.AGREE.SGfILL@[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:@U.AGREE.SGfILL@{AV+}h{aeiouyäö}n	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfILL@[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfILL@{AV+}h{aeiouyäö}n	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA
@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@i{aä}{AV+}	Possessive/Optional+Vn		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@i{aä}{AV+}	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@i{AV-}den	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@i{AV-}den	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@i{AV+}en	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@i{AV+}en	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN
@U.AGREE.PLfILL@[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:@U.AGREE.PLfILL@i{AV+}hin	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfILL@[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfILL@i{AV+}hin	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN
@U.AGREE.PLfILL@[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:@U.AGREE.PLfILL@iin{AV+}	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfILL@[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfILL@iin{AV+}	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@in{AV+}	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@in{AV+}	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/IllativeISIIN
@U.AGREE.PLfILL@[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:@U.AGREE.PLfILL@i{AV+}siin	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfILL@[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfILL@i{AV+}siin	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA
@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@i{AV-}t{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@i{AV-}t{aä}	Compounding		;


LEXICON NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@it{AV-}ten	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@it{AV-}ten	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA
@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@{AV+}j{aä}	Possessive/Optional+Vn		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.PLfPAR@{AV+}j{aä}	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@{AV+}jen	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@{AV+}jen	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/IllativeSEEN
@U.AGREE.SGfILL@[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:@U.AGREE.SGfILL@seen	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfILL@[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfILL@seen	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/GenitiveTEN
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@{AV-}ten	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@[NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:@U.AGREE.PLfGEN@{AV-}ten	Compounding		;

LEXICON NounAllomorph/IllativeVN
@U.AGREE.SGfILL@[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:@U.AGREE.SGfILL@{AV+}{aeiouyäö}n	Possessive/Optional		;
@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfILL@[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:@U.NEED.NUMERAL@@U.AGREE.SGfILL@{AV+}{aeiouyäö}n	Compounding		;



LEXICON kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_2_NOUN/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_3_NOUN/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveTA	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_4_NOUN/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;
0:{AV-}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;

LEXICON kotus_5_NOUN/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:i	NounStem/Singular	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:e	NounStem/Plural	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;

LEXICON kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:i	NounStem/Singular	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:e	NounStem/Plural	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;

LEXICON kotus_6_NOUN/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:i	NounStem/Singular	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:e	NounStem/Plural	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;

LEXICON kotus_6i_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
0:i	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:i	NounStem/Singular	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveITA	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIDEN	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/GenitiveITTEN	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:e	NounStem/Plural	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;

LEXICON kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller
0:i	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
0:e	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:e	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_8_NOUN/stemfiller
	NounStem/Nominative	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA+Vn	;
	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aä}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveJA	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveJEN	;
0:{oö}	NounAllomorph/IllativeIHIN	;
0:{oö}	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller
0:{aä}	NounStem/Nominative	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/PartitiveA	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/IllativeVN	;
0:{aä}	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIN	;
0:{aä}	NounStem/Singular	;
	NounAllomorph/PartitiveIA	;
	NounAllomorph/GenitiveIEN	;
	NounAllomorph/IllativeIIN	;
	NounStem/Plural	;

LEXICON kotus_10_NOUN/stub
juhla'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:juhl{^a}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kokoelma'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:kokoelm{^a}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
metsä'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:mets{^ä}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
ongelma'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:ongelm{^a}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pyörä'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:pyör{^ä}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
taajama'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:taajam{^a}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vapahtaja'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:vapahtaj{^a}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
joulujuhla'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:joulu{#}juhl{^a}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
neuvonantaja'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:neuvon{#}antaj{^a}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
syntymäpäivä'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10]:syntymä{#}päiv{^ä}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kummipoika'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10][KAV=D]:kummi{#}poi{k~~}{^a}{D}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
nahkakenkä'][POS=NOUN][KTN=10][KAV=G]:nahka{#}ken{k~~}{^ä}{G}	kotus_10_NOUN/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_1_NOUN/stub
juusto'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1]:juusto	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kuoro'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1]:kuoro	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
naru'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1]:naru	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pöly'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1]:pöly	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
suopursu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1]:suopursu	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vaimo'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1]:vaimo	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
huonekalu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1]:huone{#}kalu	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
maastopalo'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1]:maasto{#}palo	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
lapinvuokko'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1][KAV=A]:lapinvuok{k~~}o{A}	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vuorenhuippu'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1][KAV=B]:vuorenhuip{p~~}u{B}	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
katinlieko'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1][KAV=D]:katin{#}lie{k~~}o{D}	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
aurinko'][POS=NOUN][KTN=1][KAV=G]:aurin{k~~}o{G}	kotus_1_NOUN/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_5_NOUN/stub
kasti'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5]:kast	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
meetvursti'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5]:meetvurst	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pässi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5]:päss	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
sonni'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5]:sonn	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
velli'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5]:vell	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
taksikuski'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5]:taksi{#}kusk	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
mökki'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5][KAV=A]:mök{k~~}{A}	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kalalokki'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5][KAV=A]:kala{#}lok{k~~}{A}	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pappi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5][KAV=B]:pap{p~~}{B}	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
portti'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5][KAV=C]:port{t~~}{C}	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
pesurätti'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5][KAV=C]:pesu{#}rät{t~~}{C}	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
maalivahti'][POS=NOUN][KTN=5][KAV=F]:maali{#}vah{t~~}{F}	kotus_5i_NOUN/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_7_NOUN/stub
kivi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7]:kiv	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
onni'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7]:onn	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
polvi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7]:polv	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
salmi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7]:salm	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
sukunimi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7]:sukunim	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
talvi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7]:talv	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
väinönputki'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7]:väinönputk	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
käsikivi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7]:käsi{#}kiv	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
tuppi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7][KAV=B]:tup{p~~}{B}	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kilpi'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7][KAV=E]:kil{p~~}{E}	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
metsätähti'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7][KAV=F]:metsä{#}täh{t~~}{F}	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
olki'][POS=NOUN][KTN=7][KAV=L]:ol{k~~}{L}	kotus_7_NOUN/stemfiller	;
LEXICON kotus_9_NOUN/stub
kaula'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9]:kaul{^a}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
litra'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9]:litr{^a}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
peuranvirna'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9]:peuranvirn{^a}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
sana'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9]:san{^a}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
vaiva'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9]:vaiv{^a}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
apuraha'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9]:apu{#}rah{^a}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
oppikirja'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9]:oppi{#}kirj{^a}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
velkakirja'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9]:velka{#}kirj{^a}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
suokukka'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9][KAV=A]:suokuk{k~~}{^a}{A}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
kartta'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9][KAV=C]:kart{t~~}{^a}{C}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
aluspaita'][POS=NOUN][KTN=9][KAV=F]:alus{#}pai{t~~}{^a}{F}	kotus_9_NOUN/stemfiller	;
LEXICON Suffixes
kulmio'][POS=SUFFIX][KTN=3]:kulmio	kotus_3_NOUN/stemfiller	;
